Maryland, session 2025, SB0686.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 9–1733 and 9–1734 of Article – Environment of the Annotated Code of
Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 9–1734 and 9–1735, respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Environment
9–1701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
[(b–1) (1) “Architectural paint” means interior and exterior architectural coatings
sold in containers of 5 gallons or less.

SENATE BILL 686 3
(2) “Architectural paint” does not include industrial coatings, original
equipment coatings, or specialty coatings.]
[(i–1) “Distributor” means a company that has a contractual relationship with one
or more producers to market and sell architectural paint to retailers in the State.]
[(i–2)] (I–1) “Food residuals” means material derived from the processing or
discarding of food, including pre– and post–consumer vegetables, fruits, grains, dairy
products, and meats.
[(o–1) “Paint stewardship assessment” means the amount added to the purchase
price of architectural paint sold in the State that is necessary to cover the Paint
Stewardship Program’s cost of collecting, transporting, and processing postconsumer paint
statewide.]
[(o–2) “Postconsumer paint” means architectural paint not used and no longer
wanted by a purchaser.]
[(o–3) “Producer” means a manufacturer of architectural paint that sells, offers for
sale, or distributes the paint in the State under the producer’s own name or brand.]
[(r–2) “Representative organization” means a nonprofit organization created by
producers to implement a Paint Stewardship Program.]
[(r–3) “Retailer” means any person that offers architectural paint for sale at retail
in the State.]
[(r–4)] (R–2) “Sale” or “sell” means any transfer of title for consideration,
including remote sales conducted through sales outlets, catalogues, the Internet, or any
other similar electronic means.
9–1702.
(a) There is an Office of Recycling created within the Department.
(b) The Secretary shall appoint a Director and sufficient staff to perform the
functions of the Office. After July 1, 1989, the number of staff shall be as provided in the
budget.
(c) The Secretary may adopt regulations to carry out the provisions of this
subtitle.
(d) The Office shall:

SENATE BILL 686
(1) Assist the counties in developing an acceptable recycling plan required
under § 9–1703 of this subtitle and § 9–505 of this title, including technical assistance to
the local governments;
(2) Coordinate the efforts of the State to facilitate the implementation of
the recycling goals at the county level;
(3) Review all recycling plans submitted as part of a county plan as
required under § 9–505 of this title and advise the Secretary on the adequacy of the
recycling plan;
(4) Administer the Statewide Electronics Recycling Program under Part IV
of this subtitle;
(5) Promote the development of markets for recycled materials and
recycled products in the State in accordance with § 9–1702.1 of this subtitle; [and]
(6) Review and approve plans and annual reports, including the paint
stewardship assessment, submitted in accordance with a Paint Stewardship Program
established under Part V of this subtitle; AND
(7) REVIEW AND APPROVE PLANS AND ANNUAL REPORTS SUBMITTED
IN ACCORDANCE WITH A BATTERY STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER
PART VI OF THIS SUBTITLE.
9–1733.
(A) IN THIS PART V OF THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(B) (1) “ARCHITECTURAL PAINT” MEANS INTERIOR AND EXTERIOR
ARCHITECTURAL COATINGS SOLD IN CONTAINERS OF 5 GALLONS OR LESS.
(2) “ARCHITECTURAL PAINT” DOES NOT INCLUDE INDUSTRIAL
COATINGS, ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT COATINGS, OR SPECIALTY COATINGS.
(C) “DISTRIBUTOR” MEANS A COMPANY THAT HAS A CONTRACTUAL
RELATIONSHIP WITH ONE OR MORE PRODUCERS TO MARKET AND SELL
ARCHITECTURAL PAINT TO RETAILERS IN THE STATE.
(D) “PAINT STEWARDSHIP ASSESSMENT” MEANS THE AMOUNT ADDED TO
THE PURCHASE PRICE OF ARCHITECTURAL PAINT SOLD IN THE STATE THAT IS
NECESSARY TO COVER THE PAINT STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM’S COST OF
COLLECTING, TRANSPORTING, AND PROCESSING POSTCONSUMER PAINT
STATEWIDE.

SENATE BILL 686 5
(E) “POSTCONSUMER PAINT” MEANS ARCHITECTURAL PAINT NOT USED
AND NO LONGER WANTED BY A PURCHASER.
(F) “PRODUCER” MEANS A MANUFACTURER OF ARCHITECTURAL PAINT
THAT SELLS, OFFERS FOR SALE, OR DISTRIBUTES THE PAINT IN THE STATE UNDER
THE PRODUCER’S OWN NAME OR BRAND.
(G) “REPRESENTATIVE ORGANIZATION” MEANS A NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATION CREATED BY PRODUCERS TO IMPLEMENT A PAINT STEWARDSHIP
PROGRAM.
(H) “RETAILER” MEANS ANY PERSON THAT OFFERS ARCHITECTURAL PAINT
FOR SALE AT RETAIL IN THE STATE.
9–1736. RESERVED.
9–1737. RESERVED.
PART VI. BATTERY STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM.
9–1738.
(A) IN THIS PART VI OF THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(B) “ADVISORY COUNCIL” MEANS THE BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ADVISORY
COUNCIL ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–1742 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) (1) “BATTERY–CONTAINING PRODUCT” MEANS A PRODUCT THAT
CONTAINS OR IS PACKAGED WITH TWO OR MORE COVERED BATTERIES.
(2) “BATTERY–CONTAINING PRODUCT” DOES NOT INCLUDE AN
ELECTRONIC DEVICE THAT IS SUBJECT TO A COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE
TAKEBACK PROGRAM IN ACCORDANCE WITH PART IV OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) “BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION” MEANS A NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATION THAT IS:
(1) EXEMPT FROM TAXATION UNDER § 501(C)(3) OF THE INTERNAL
REVENUE CODE; AND

SENATE BILL 686
(2) CREATED BY A GROUP OF PRODUCERS TO IMPLEMENT A BATTERY
STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE.
(E) “BATTERY STEWARDSHIP PLAN” MEANS A PLAN SUBMITTED TO THE
DEPARTMENT BY A PRODUCER OR BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–1739 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(F) “COLLECTION SITE” MEANS A LOCATION DESIGNATED UNDER A
BATTERY STEWARDSHIP PLAN TO ACCEPT COVERED BATTERIES AND
BATTERY–CONTAINING PRODUCTS FROM COVERED ENTITIES.
(G) (1) “COVERED BATTERY” MEANS A:
(I) PORTABLE BATTERY;
(II) MEDIUM–FORMAT BATTERY; OR
(III) PRIMARY BATTERY.
(2) “COVERED BATTERY” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) ANY MEDICAL DEVICE, PROVIDED THAT THE MEDICAL
DEVICE IS NOT DESIGNED AND MARKETED FOR SALE OR RESALE PRINCIPALLY TO
CONSUMERS FOR PERSONAL USE; OR
(II) A LARGE LEAD ACID BATTERY.
(H) (1) “COVERED ENTITY” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL OR ENTITY THAT CAN
USE A BATTERY STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM AT NO COST.
(2) “COVERED ENTITY” INCLUDES:
(I) A RESIDENT OF THE STATE;
(II) A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION LOCATED IN THE STATE;
(III) A FOR–PROFIT ENTITY LOCATED IN THE STATE; AND
(IV) A UNIT OF STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT.
(I) “MEDIUM–FORMAT BATTERY” MEANS A RECHARGEABLE BATTERY
THAT:

SENATE BILL 686 7
(1) (I) WEIGHS MORE THAN 11 POUNDS; OR
(II) HAS A RATING OF MORE THAN 300 WATT–HOURS;
(2) WEIGHS 25 POUNDS OR LESS; AND
(3) HAS A RATING OF 2,000 WATT–HOURS OR LESS.
(J) “PORTABLE BATTERY” MEANS A RECHARGEABLE BATTERY THAT:
(1) WEIGHS 11 POUNDS OR LESS; AND
(2) HAS A RATING OF 300 WATT–HOURS OR LESS.
(K) “PRIMARY BATTERY” MEANS A NONRECHARGEABLE BATTERY THAT:
(1) WEIGHS 4.4 POUNDS OR LESS;
(2) IS SEALED; AND
(3) IS OF A TYPE USED BY CONSUMERS AS A POWER SOURCE FOR
CONSUMER PRODUCTS.
(L) (1) “PRODUCER” MEANS A PERSON THAT:
(I) WITH RESPECT TO A COVERED BATTERY THAT IS SOLD,
OFFERED FOR SALE, OR DISTRIBUTED IN THE STATE:
1. A. HAS LEGAL OWNERSHIP OF THE BRAND OF THE
COVERED BATTERY UNDER WHICH THE COVERED BATTERY IS SOLD; OR
B. IS THE MANUFACTURER OF THE COVERED BATTERY,
IF THE COVERED BATTERY LACKS IDENTIFICATION OF THE BRAND;
2. IS THE LICENSEE OF THE BRAND OR TRADEMARK
UNDER WHICH THE COVERED BATTERY IS SOLD, WHETHER OR NOT THE TRADEMARK
IS REGISTERED IN THE STATE, IF THE COVERED BATTERY IS MANUFACTURED BY A
PERSON OTHER THAN THE BRAND OWNERS; OR
3. IS THE PERSON THAT IMPORTS THE COVERED
BATTERY INTO THE UNITED STATES FOR USE IN A COMMERCIAL ENTERPRISE THAT
SELLS, OFFERS FOR SALE, OR DISTRIBUTES THE COVERED BATTERY IN THE STATE,
IF THERE IS NO PERSON DESCRIBED IN ITEMS 1 AND 2 OF THIS ITEM; AND

SENATE BILL 686
(II) WITH RESPECT TO A BATTERY–CONTAINING PRODUCT
THAT IS SOLD, OFFERED FOR SALE, OR DISTRIBUTED IN THE STATE:
1. A. HAS LEGAL OWNERSHIP OF THE BRAND OF THE
BATTERY–CONTAINING PRODUCT UNDER WHICH THE BATTERY–CONTAINING
PRODUCT IS SOLD; OR
B. IS THE MANUFACTURER OF THE
BATTERY–CONTAINING PRODUCT, IF THE BATTERY–CONTAINING PRODUCT LACKS
IDENTIFICATION OF THE BRAND;
2. IS THE LICENSEE OF THE BRAND OR TRADEMARK
UNDER WHICH THE BATTERY–CONTAINING PRODUCT IS SOLD, WHETHER OR NOT
THE TRADEMARK IS REGISTERED IN THE STATE, IF THE BATTERY–CONTAINING
PRODUCT IS MANUFACTURED BY A PERSON OTHER THAN THE BRAND OWNERS; OR
3. IS THE PERSON THAT IMPORTS THE
BATTERY–CONTAINING PRODUCT INTO THE UNITED STATES FOR USE IN A
COMMERCIAL ENTERPRISE THAT SELLS, OFFERS FOR SALE, OR DISTRIBUTES THE
BATTERY–CONTAINING PRODUCT IN THE STATE, IF THERE IS NO PERSON
DESCRIBED IN ITEMS 1 AND 2 OF THIS ITEM.
(2) “PRODUCER” DOES NOT INCLUDE AN ENTITY THAT HAS
EXECUTED AN AGREEMENT WITH ANOTHER ENTITY, UNDER WHICH THE OTHER
ENTITY HAS AGREED TO ASSUME RESPONSIBILITY UNDER A BATTERY STEWARDSHIP
PROGRAM FOR ANY COVERED BATTERY OR BATTERY–CONTAINING PRODUCT
ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE FIRST ENTITY.
(M) “PROGRAM” MEANS A BATTERY STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM ESTABLISHED
UNDER A BATTERY STEWARDSHIP PLAN APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER §
9–1739 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
9–1739.
(A) (1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
APPROVE A SINGLE BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION TO FULFILL THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) (I) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, AND EACH YEAR THEREAFTER,
THE BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION SHALL FILE A REGISTRATION FORM
WITH THE DEPARTMENT.

SENATE BILL 686 9
(II) THE REGISTRATION FORM SHALL INCLUDE:
1. A LIST OF THE PRODUCERS PARTICIPATING IN THE
BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION;
2. A LIST OF THE BRANDS OF EACH PRODUCER
PARTICIPATING IN THE BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION;
3. A LIST OF THE COVERED BATTERIES AND
BATTERY–CONTAINING PRODUCTS OF EACH PRODUCER PARTICIPATING IN THE
BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION; AND
4. THE NAME, ADDRESS, AND CONTACT INFORMATION
OF A PERSON RESPONSIBLE FOR ENSURING COMPLIANCE BY THE BATTERY
STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION AND THE MEMBER PRODUCERS WITH THIS PART VI
OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(III) AT THE TIME OF FILING THE REGISTRATION FORM, THE
BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION SHALL PAY TO THE DEPARTMENT AN
ANNUAL REGISTRATION FEE TO COVER THE COSTS OF RECORD KEEPING, AS SET BY
THE DEPARTMENT IN REGULATION.
(3) (I) ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2029, A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION
MAY REQUEST THAT THE DEPARTMENT DESIGNATE THE NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATION AS AN ADDITIONAL BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT MAY DESIGNATE A NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATION AS AN ADDITIONAL BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION IF THE
DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT THE DESIGNATION OF THE ADDITIONAL BATTERY
STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION IS NECESSARY TO:
1. INCREASE RECYCLING RATES; OR
2. IMPROVE RECYCLING SERVICES FOR A SPECIFIC
TYPE OF COVERED BATTERY OR BATTERY–CONTAINING PRODUCT.
(III) IF THE DEPARTMENT APPROVES THE DESIGNATION OF AN
ADDITIONAL BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION,
THE BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION SHALL:
1. NOT LATER THAN 30 DAYS AFTER BEING APPROVED
BY THE DEPARTMENT AND ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, FILE A
REGISTRATION FORM WITH THE DEPARTMENT CONTAINING THE INFORMATION

SENATE BILL 686
REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND PAY THE ANNUAL
REGISTRATION FEE DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (2)(III) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
2. COORDINATE WITH THE BATTERY STEWARDSHIP
ORGANIZATION APPROVED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT, AND LOCAL GOVERNMENTS TO ENSURE THAT:
A. BATTERY COLLECTION AND RECYCLING SERVICES
ARE PROVIDED IN A SEAMLESS MANNER; AND
B. PUBLIC OUTREACH, EDUCATION, AND
COMMUNICATION ARE PROVIDED IN A CONSISTENT MANNER.
(B) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, AND EVERY 5 YEARS THEREAFTER,
EACH PRODUCER SHALL, INDIVIDUALLY OR AS PART OF A BATTERY STEWARDSHIP
ORGANIZATION, SUBMIT A BATTERY STEWARDSHIP PLAN TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR
REVIEW AND APPROVAL.
(2) BEFORE SUBMITTING THE PLAN REQUIRED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION TO THE DEPARTMENT, A PRODUCER OR BATTERY STEWARDSHIP
ORGANIZATION SHALL CONSULT WITH THE ADVISORY COUNCIL ESTABLISHED
UNDER § 9–1742 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, A PRODUCER MAY NOT SELL,
OFFER FOR SALE, DISTRIBUTE, OR IMPORT FOR SALE OR DISTRIBUTION COVERED
BATTERIES OR BATTERY–CONTAINING PRODUCTS IN OR INTO THE STATE UNLESS
THE PRODUCER, INDIVIDUALLY OR AS PART OF A BATTERY STEWARDSHIP
ORGANIZATION, HAS AN APPROVED BATTERY STEWARDSHIP PLAN ON FILE WITH
THE DEPARTMENT.
(C) A BATTERY STEWARDSHIP PLAN SHALL:
(1) IDENTIFY THE PRODUCERS COVERED BY THE PLAN, INCLUDING
THE CONTACT INFORMATION FOR EACH PARTICIPATING PRODUCER AND THE
BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION;
(2) IDENTIFY EACH BRAND OF COVERED BATTERY AND
BATTERY–CONTAINING PRODUCT COVERED BY THE PLAN;
(3) ESTABLISH, IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS
SECTION, PERFORMANCE GOALS THAT MEASURE, ON AN ANNUAL BASIS, THE
ACHIEVEMENTS OF THE BATTERY STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM TO BE IMPLEMENTED BY
THE BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION, INCLUDING:

SENATE BILL 686 11
(I) THE COLLECTION RATE FOR BATTERIES IN THE STATE;
(II) THE RECYCLING EFFICIENCY RATE OF THE PROGRAM; AND
(III) PUBLIC AWARENESS OF THE PROGRAM;
(4) DESCRIBE HOW THE PERFORMANCE GOALS ESTABLISHED UNDER
ITEM (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION WILL BE MET OR EXCEEDED;
(5) PROVIDE A LIST OF THE COLLECTION SITES SUPPORTED BY THE
PROGRAM, INCLUDING THE ADDRESSES OF THE COLLECTION SITES, AND DESCRIBE
HOW THE PROGRAM WILL PROVIDE FREE, CONVENIENT, AND EQUITABLE SERVICE
IN EVERY REGION OF THE STATE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS
SECTION;
(6) DESCRIBE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS
SECTION, THE FINANCING METHOD THAT WILL BE USED TO IMPLEMENT THE
PROGRAM;
(7) DESCRIBE HOW STAKEHOLDER COMMENTS WERE CONSIDERED IN
THE DEVELOPMENT OF THE PLAN;
(8) DESCRIBE HOW STAFFING AND ADMINISTERING THE
IMPLEMENTATION OF THE PROGRAM WILL BE HANDLED;
(9) DESCRIBE THE ACTIONS TAKEN OR THAT WILL BE TAKEN FOR
PUBLIC OUTREACH, EDUCATION, AND COMMUNICATION, TAKING INTO ACCOUNT
THAT PUBLIC OUTREACH, EDUCATION, AND COMMUNICATION SHALL:
(I) PROMOTE THE RESPONSIBLE END–OF–LIFE MANAGEMENT
OF COVERED BATTERIES AND BATTERY–CONTAINING PRODUCTS; AND
(II) PROVIDE INFORMATION ON HOW TO SAFELY RETURN
COVERED BATTERIES AND BATTERY–CONTAINING PRODUCTS FOR COLLECTION AND
RECYCLING;
(10) DESCRIBE THE PROCESS BY WHICH A LOCAL GOVERNMENT
FACILITY THAT ACTS AS A COLLECTION SITE UNDER THE PROGRAM MAY REQUEST
REIMBURSEMENT FOR COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH ACCEPTING AND STORING
COVERED BATTERIES AND BATTERY–CONTAINING PRODUCTS; AND
(11) INCLUDE ANY OTHER INFORMATION THAT IS REQUIRED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.

SENATE BILL 686
(D) THE PERFORMANCE GOALS ESTABLISHED FOR A BATTERY
STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM SHALL AT A MINIMUM INCLUDE:
(1) TARGET COLLECTION RATES FOR RECHARGEABLE BATTERIES
AND PRIMARY BATTERIES; AND
(2) TARGET RECYCLING EFFICIENCY RATES OF AT LEAST:
(I) 60% FOR RECHARGEABLE BATTERIES; AND
(II) 70% FOR PRIMARY BATTERIES.
(E) (1) A BATTERY STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM SHALL PROVIDE FREE,
CONVENIENT, AND EQUITABLE SERVICE IN EVERY REGION OF THE STATE, SUCH
THAT THE COLLECTION OF COVERED BATTERIES AND BATTERY–CONTAINING
PRODUCTS IS AS EASY AS TRASH DISPOSAL.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE ADVISORY
COUNCIL ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–1742 OF THIS SUBTITLE, SHALL BY REGULATION
ESTABLISH REQUIREMENTS REGARDING:
(I) THE MINIMUM TOTAL NUMBER OF COLLECTION SITES
PROVIDED BY A PROGRAM;
(II) THE PROXIMITY OF COLLECTION SITES TO POPULATION
CENTERS; AND
(III) THE USE OF ANNUAL BATTERY COLLECTION EVENTS IN
REGIONS WHERE THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A PERMANENT COLLECTION SITE IS NOT
PRACTICABLE.
(3) MEDIUM–FORMAT BATTERIES MAY BE COLLECTED ONLY AT
HOUSEHOLD HAZARDOUS WASTE ACCEPTANCE SITES OR OTHER STAFFED
COLLECTION SITES THAT MEET APPLICABLE STATE AND FEDERAL REQUIREMENTS
TO MANAGE MEDIUM–FORMAT BATTERIES.
(F) THE FINANCING METHOD THAT WILL BE USED BY A BATTERY
STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION TO IMPLEMENT A BATTERY STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM
SHALL:
(1) APPORTION ALL COSTS OF THE PROGRAM AMONG THE
PRODUCERS PARTICIPATING IN THE PROGRAM;

SENATE BILL 686 13
(2) BE STRUCTURED IN A MANNER THAT ENCOURAGES
PARTICIPATING PRODUCERS TO EMBRACE DESIGN ATTRIBUTES THAT REDUCE THE
ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACTS OF THEIR PRODUCTS, INCLUDING THROUGH THE USE OF
ECO–MODULATED FEES TO:
(I) ENCOURAGE DESIGNS INTENDED TO FACILITATE REUSE
AND RECYCLING;
(II) ENCOURAGE THE USE OF RECYCLED CONTENT;
(III) DISCOURAGE THE USE OF PROBLEMATIC MATERIALS THAT
INCREASE THE COSTS OF MANAGING BATTERIES; AND
(IV) ENCOURAGE OTHER DESIGN ATTRIBUTES THAT REDUCE
ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACTS OR ENHANCE THE SAFETY OF BATTERIES; AND
(3) MEET ANY OTHER REQUIREMENT ESTABLISHED BY THE
DEPARTMENT BY REGULATION.
(G) (1) WITHIN 120 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING A PROPOSED BATTERY
STEWARDSHIP PLAN, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL APPROVE, APPROVE WITH
CONDITIONS, OR REJECT THE PLAN.
(2) IN MAKING A DETERMINATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSIDER WHETHER:
(I) THE BATTERY STEWARDSHIP PLAN COMPLIES WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION, INCLUDING WHETHER THE FINANCING METHOD
WILL COVER THE COSTS OF IMPLEMENTING THE PROGRAM; AND
(II) THE BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION ENGAGED
SUFFICIENTLY WITH STAKEHOLDERS, INCLUDING LOCAL GOVERNMENTS, IN
DEVELOPING THE PLAN.
(3) NOT LATER THAN 60 DAYS AFTER THE DATE A BATTERY
STEWARDSHIP PLAN IS INITIALLY APPROVED UNDER THIS SECTION, THE ENTITY
THAT SUBMITTED THE PLAN SHALL PAY TO THE DEPARTMENT:
(I) THE DEPARTMENT’S COST OF REVIEWING THE PLAN; AND
(II) THE DEPARTMENT’S ESTIMATED COSTS OF
ADMINISTERING, OVERSEEING, AND ENFORCING THE PLAN BETWEEN THE INITIAL
DATE OF APPROVAL AND THE DATE OF THE INITIAL ANNUAL REPORT REQUIRED
UNDER § 9–1743 OF THIS SUBTITLE.

SENATE BILL 686
(H) IMPLEMENTATION OF THE BATTERY STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM
DESCRIBED IN AN APPROVED BATTERY STEWARDSHIP PLAN SHALL BEGIN NOT
LATER THAN 6 MONTHS AFTER THE DATE THE PLAN IS APPROVED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(I) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION
AND SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN APPROVED BATTERY
STEWARDSHIP PLAN SHALL EXPIRE AFTER 5 YEARS.
(2) A BATTERY STEWARDSHIP PLAN MAY CONTINUE AFTER 5 YEARS
IF IT IS RENEGOTIATED, RENEWED, OR AMENDED AND APPROVED BY THE
DEPARTMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT MAY RESCIND APPROVAL OF A BATTERY
STEWARDSHIP PLAN AT ANY TIME FOR GOOD CAUSE.
(4) IF THE DEPARTMENT RESCINDS AN APPROVAL OF A BATTERY
STEWARDSHIP PLAN UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE BATTERY
STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION MAY AMEND THE PLAN AND SUBMIT IT TO THE
DEPARTMENT FOR APPROVAL IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE.
(5) IF, BASED ON THE ANNUAL REPORT SUBMITTED UNDER § 9–1743
OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE PERFORMANCE GOALS ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION
(C)(3) OF THIS SECTION HAVE NOT BEEN ACHIEVED, THE DEPARTMENT MAY:
(I) REQUIRE THAT A BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION
AMEND THE BATTERY STEWARDSHIP PLAN; AND
(II) IMPOSE A PENALTY ON A PRODUCER OR BATTERY
STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–1746 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(6) IF THE DEPARTMENT REQUIRES A BATTERY STEWARDSHIP
ORGANIZATION TO AMEND A BATTERY STEWARDSHIP PLAN UNDER PARAGRAPH (5)
OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION SHALL COVER
THE COST OF THE DEPARTMENT’S REVIEW AND SUPPLEMENTAL WORK ON THE
PLAN.
9–1740.
IN DESIGNING AND IMPLEMENTING A BATTERY STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM, A
BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION SHALL:

SENATE BILL 686 15
(1) USE EXISTING PUBLIC AND PRIVATE WASTE COLLECTION
SERVICES AND FACILITIES, INCLUDING BATTERY COLLECTION LOCATIONS,
TRANSPORTERS, CONSOLIDATORS, PROCESSORS, AND RETAILERS, IF
COST–EFFECTIVE, MUTUALLY AGREEABLE, AND OTHERWISE PRACTICABLE; AND
(2) COORDINATE ACTIVITIES WITH RELEVANT OPERATORS,
INCLUDING ELECTRONIC WASTE RECYCLERS, FOR THE PURPOSE OF PROVIDING THE
EFFICIENT DELIVERY OF SERVICES AND AVOIDING UNNECESSARY DUPLICATION OF
EFFORT.
9–1741.
(A) A BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION SHALL COVER ALL COSTS OF
A BATTERY STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM, INCLUDING:
(1) THE COSTS TO:
(I) COLLECT, TRANSPORT, PROCESS, AND OTHERWISE
MANAGE THE COVERED BATTERIES AND BATTERY–CONTAINING PRODUCTS
RETURNED BY COVERED ENTITIES;
(II) RAISE PUBLIC AWARENESS OF AND PARTICIPATION IN THE
PROGRAM;
(III) REIMBURSE LOCAL GOVERNMENTS THAT SERVE AS
COLLECTION SITES OR OTHERWISE ASSIST WITH IMPLEMENTING THE PROGRAM;
AND
(IV) RECYCLE, REUSE, OR SAFELY DISPOSE OF COVERED
BATTERIES AND BATTERY–CONTAINING PRODUCTS, INCLUDING ANY DAMAGED OR
DEFECTIVE COVERED BATTERIES OR BATTERY–CONTAINING PRODUCTS,
COLLECTED UNDER THE PROGRAM; AND
(2) THE ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT TO
IMPLEMENT THIS PART VI OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) AT A MINIMUM, A BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION SHALL
PROVIDE AT NO COST TO COLLECTION SITES:
(1) APPROPRIATE CONTAINERS FOR COVERED BATTERIES SUBJECT
TO THE BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION’S PROGRAM, INCLUDING
APPROPRIATE CONTAINERS FOR DAMAGED AND DEFECTIVE BATTERIES;

SENATE BILL 686
(2) TRAINING;
(3) SIGNAGE,
(4) SAFETY GUIDANCE; AND
(5) EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS.
9–1742.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH THE BATTERY STEWARDSHIP
ADVISORY COUNCIL TO:
(1) ADVISE ON THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS PART VI OF THIS
SUBTITLE, INCLUDING THE ADOPTION OF IMPLEMENTING REGULATIONS; AND
(2) ASSIST WITH THE DEVELOPMENT AND REVIEW OF BATTERY
STEWARDSHIP PLANS UNDER § 9–1739 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) THE ADVISORY COUNCIL SHALL CONSIST OF MEMBERS
APPOINTED BY THE SECRETARY, REPRESENTING A BROAD RANGE OF INTERESTED
STAKEHOLDERS, INCLUDING:
(I) REPRESENTATIVES OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT;
(II) INDUSTRY REPRESENTATIVES; AND
(III) REPRESENTATIVES OF THE ENVIRONMENTAL COMMUNITY.
(2) IN APPOINTING MEMBERS TO THE ADVISORY COUNCIL, THE
SECRETARY SHALL, TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, ENSURE THAT THE
MEMBERSHIP OF THE ADVISORY COUNCIL REPRESENTS:
(I) ALL GEOGRAPHIC REGIONS OF THE STATE; AND
(II) LARGE AND SMALL COUNTIES AND MUNICIPALITIES.
(C) THE SECRETARY SHALL DESIGNATE THE CHAIR OF THE ADVISORY
COUNCIL.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE STAFF FOR THE ADVISORY
COUNCIL.
(E) A MEMBER OF THE ADVISORY COUNCIL:

SENATE BILL 686 17
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
ADVISORY COUNCIL; BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(F) THE ADVISORY COUNCIL SHALL MEET AT THE REQUEST OF THE
SECRETARY.
(G) THE ADVISORY COUNCIL SHALL:
(1) MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE DEPARTMENT REGARDING
BATTERY STEWARDSHIP PLAN APPROVAL;
(2) MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE DEPARTMENT AND BATTERY
STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATIONS REGARDING PROGRAM IMPLEMENTATION; AND
(3) PERFORM ANY OTHER FUNCTION ASSIGNED TO THE ADVISORY
COUNCIL BY THE SECRETARY.
9–1743.
(A) BEGINNING MARCH 1, 2028, EACH BATTERY STEWARDSHIP
ORGANIZATION THAT HAS AN APPROVED BATTERY STEWARDSHIP PLAN ON FILE
WITH THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT ANNUALLY TO THE DEPARTMENT ON THE
PROGRESS TOWARD MEETING PLAN REQUIREMENTS AND PROGRAM GOALS FOR THE
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR.
(B) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) A DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF THE REIMBURSEMENT METHODS
USED FOR COLLECTING, TRANSPORTING, AND PROCESSING COVERED BATTERIES
AND BATTERY–CONTAINING PRODUCTS UNDER THE PROGRAM;
(2) (I) THE STATUS ON ACHIEVING THE PERFORMANCE GOALS
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–1739(C)(3) OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(II) IF THE GOALS HAVE NOT BEEN ACHIEVED, A DESCRIPTION
OF THE ACTIONS PROPOSED TO ACHIEVE THE GOALS;

SENATE BILL 686
(3) THE AMOUNT OF EACH CATEGORY OF COVERED BATTERIES AND
BATTERY–CONTAINING PRODUCTS COLLECTED IN THE STATE UNDER THE
PROGRAM, INCLUDING THE METHOD OF DISPOSITION OF EACH CATEGORY;
(4) THE TOTAL COST OF IMPLEMENTING THE PROGRAM;
(5) SAMPLES OF ALL EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS PROVIDED TO
COLLECTION SITES AND THE PUBLIC UNDER THE PROGRAM;
(6) A DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF THE ACTIONS TAKEN AND AN
EVALUATION OF THE METHODS USED TO DISSEMINATE EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS,
INCLUDING RECOMMENDATIONS, IF ANY, FOR HOW THE EDUCATIONAL COMPONENT
OF THE PROGRAM CAN BE IMPROVED; AND
(7) ANY OTHER INFORMATION AS REQUIRED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(C) WHEN PROVIDING THE DEPARTMENT WITH THE ANNUAL REPORT
REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION, A BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION SHALL
PAY TO THE DEPARTMENT THE DEPARTMENT’S ESTIMATED COSTS OF
ADMINISTERING, OVERSEEING, AND ENFORCING THE PLAN FOR THE 1 YEAR
IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING THE ANNUAL REPORT.
(D) FINANCIAL, PRODUCTION, OR SALES DATA REPORTED TO THE
DEPARTMENT BY A BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION SHALL BE KEPT
CONFIDENTIAL BY THE DEPARTMENT AND MAY NOT BE SUBJECT TO PUBLIC
INSPECTION.
(E) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, THE REPORT SHALL BE
POSTED ON THE WEBSITE OF THE DEPARTMENT AND THE BATTERY STEWARDSHIP
ORGANIZATION.
9–1744.
ANY PERSON PARTICIPATING IN A BATTERY STEWARDSHIP PLAN IN
COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE IS IMMUNE FROM LIABILITY UNDER STATE LAW
RELATING TO ANTITRUST AND RESTRAINT OF TRADE FOR ANY COOPERATED
ACTIVITIES ARISING OUT OF THE RECYCLING, REUSE, AND DISPOSAL OF PACKAGING
MATERIALS.
9–1745.
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SUBTITLE.

SENATE BILL 686 19
9–1746.
THE PROVISIONS OF §§ 9–334 THROUGH 9–344 OF THIS TITLE APPLY TO
ENFORCE VIOLATIONS OF:
(1) THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) ANY REGULATION ADOPTED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(3) ANY ORDER ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section(s) 6–1101 through
6–1114 and the subtitle “Subtitle 11. Rechargeable Batteries” of Article – Environment of
the Annotated Code of Maryland be repealed.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 3 of this Act shall take
effect January 1, 2028.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in Section
4 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2025.